North Carolina statutes. Chapter 161. Register of Deeds.
Article 2. The Duties.

§§ 161-12,
161-13.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1027.

§ 161-14.
Registration of instruments.

After the register of deeds has determined that all statutory and locally adopted prerequisites for recording have been met, the register of deeds shall immediately register all written instruments presented to him for registration. When an instrument is presented for registration, the register of deeds shall endorse upon it the day and hour on which it was presented. This endorsement forms a part of the registration of the instrument. All instruments shall be registered in the precise order in which they were presented for registration. Immediately after endorsing the day and hour of presentation upon an instrument, the register of deeds shall index and cross-index it in its proper sequence. The register of deeds shall then proceed to register it on the day that it is presented unless a temporary index has been established.The register of deeds may establish a temporary index in which all instruments presented for registration shall be indexed until they are registered and entered in the permanent indexes. A temporary index shall operate in all respects as the permanent index. All instruments presented for registration shall be registered and indexed and cross-indexed on the permanent indexes not later than 30 days after the date of presentation.

All instruments, except instruments conforming to the provisions of

G.S. 25-9-521

, presented for registration on paper shall meet all of the following requirements:

Be eight and one-half inches by eleven inches or eight and one-half inches by fourteen inches.

Have a blank margin of three inches at the top of the first page and blank margins of at least one-half inches on the remaining sides of the first page and on all sides of subsequent pages.

Be typed or printed in black on white paper in a legible font. A font size no smaller than 9 points shall be considered legible. Blanks in an instrument may be completed in pen and corrections to an instrument may be made in pen.

Have text typed or printed on one side of a page only.

State the type of instrument at the top of the first page.If an instrument does not meet these requirements, the register of deeds shall register the instrument after collecting the fee for nonstandard documents as required by G.S. 161-10(a)(18a) in addition to all other applicable recording fees. However, if an instrument fails to meet the requirements because it contains print in a font size smaller than 9 points, the register of deeds may register the instrument without collecting the fee for nonstandard documents if, in the discretion of the register of deeds, the instrument is legible.

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-35, s. 4, effective June 21, 2019.

For the purposes of this section, the term “instrument” means all of the following for which a fee is collected under

G.S. 161-10(a)

:

Instruments in General.

Deeds of Trust, Mortgages, and Cancellation of Deeds of Trust and Mortgages.

Uniform Commercial Code filings.

Torrens Registrations.

Master Forms.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the register of deeds shall immediately register a written instrument presented to him or her for registration that meets the following requirements: (i) the instrument is a portion of a map of a cemetery that was divided into sections based upon race, (ii) the other portion of the map of a cemetery was properly registered in the office of the register of deeds, and (iii) the unregistered portion of the map does not have the surveyor’s stamp or seal and original signature affixed.

History.

R.C., c. 37, s. 23; 1868, c. 35, s. 9; Code, s. 3654; Rev., s. 2658; C.S., s. 3553; 1921, c. 114; 1971, c. 657; 1998-184, s. 5; 2001-390, s. 5; 2001-464, ss. 2, 3; 2002-159, s. 53; 2011-75, s. 1; 2011-296, s. 6; 2019-35, s. 4; 2019-117, s. 1.

Local Modification.

Cabarrus: 2002-115, s. 3 (applicable to documents filed with register of deeds only); Durham: 2003-326, s. 2.1; Harnett: 2003-326, s. 2.1; Mecklenburg: 2002-115, s. 3 (applicable to documents filed with register of deeds only); Moore: 2003-326, s. 2.1; New Hanover: 2003-326, s. 2.1; Randolph: 2003-326, s. 2.1.

Cross References.

As to requisites and formalities of the registration of deeds and mortgages generally, see

G.S. 47-17

et seq.

As to indexing of instruments, see

G.S. 161-21

and

G.S. 161-22

.

§ 161-14.01.
Registration of instruments for business and other purposes.

The register of deeds is hereby authorized to record and file documents relating to persons, partnerships, and corporations for business and other purposes, including but not limited to certificates of partnerships, assumed business names, incorporations, dissolutions, or amendments thereto, in a consolidated book or record, including books or records used for the filing of deeds, deeds of trust, leases, and similar documents. It is the intent of this section that the register of deeds may file and record some or all of the above instruments and documents and those of a similar nature in one book or record or in a series of books or records consolidated for recording purposes; provided, said instruments and documents shall be indexed as required by law.

All other laws providing for the filing of documents provided for herein shall not be applicable to the county upon adoption by the register of deeds of a consolidated recording and filing system as authorized herein.

History.

1973, c. 1013, ss. 1, 2.

§ 2.
Registration of documents or instruments purporting to impact official birth records.

Prior to recording a document or instrument that (i) purports to impact an official record of birth meeting the requirements of

G.S. 161-14

and (ii) is not a birth registration or birth certificate, an amendment of a birth certificate, or a certificate of identification as defined in Article 4 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes, the Register of Deeds shall conspicuously mark the first page of the document or instrument with the following statement:“THIS DOCUMENT IS NOT AN OFFICIAL BIRTH RECORD.”

This section does not apply to a document or instrument which is attached to real estate documents as an exhibit.

History.

2015-197, s. 1.

§ 161-14.03.
Registration of documents purporting to impact official marriage records.

Prior to recording a document or instrument that (i) purports to impact an official record of marriage meeting the requirements of

G.S. 51-16

and (ii) is not a marriage license, a return, or an amendment or correction of a marriage license as described in Article 2 of Chapter 51 of the General Statutes, the register of deeds shall conspicuously mark the first page of the document or instrument with the following statement:“THIS DOCUMENT IS NOT AN OFFICIAL MARRIAGE DOCUMENT.”

This section shall not apply to instruments or documents that are attached as exhibits to land records, orders or judgments issued by a court of this State or another state, or separation agreements presented for registration.

History.

2015-53, s. 1.

§ 161-14.1.
Recording subsequent entries as separate instruments.

As used in this section, the following terms mean:

Original instrument. — The previously recorded instrument that is modified, amended, restated, supplemented, assigned, satisfied, terminated, revoked, or cancelled by a subsequent instrument.

Recording data. — The book and page number or document number that indicates where an instrument is recorded in the office of the register of deeds.

Subsequent instrument. — Any instrument presented for registration that indicates in its title or within the first two pages of its text that it is intended or purports to modify, amend, restate, supplement, assign, satisfy, terminate, revoke, or cancel a previously registered instrument. Examples of subsequent instruments include the following:

The appointment or designation of a substitute trustee in a deed of trust.

A corrective notice affidavit registered pursuant to

G.S. 47-36.1

or a curative affidavit registered pursuant to

G.S. 47-36.2

.

A lien maturity extension agreement or notice of maturity date registered pursuant to G.S. 45-36.1.

A document of rescission registered pursuant to

G.S. 45-36.6

.

The cancellation of a Notice of Inactive Hazardous Substance or Waste Disposal Site registered pursuant to G.S. 130A-310.8(f).

A record of satisfaction or other instrument purporting to satisfy a security instrument registered pursuant to

G.S. 45-37

or

G.S. 45-37.2

.

A notice of foreclosure registered pursuant to

G.S. 45-38

.

An assignment of a security instrument or lease.

An instrument that amends, modifies, or restates an original instrument, such as an amendment or modification agreement or an amended and restated instrument.

A release or partial release of property from the lien of a security instrument, including a partial release registered pursuant to

G.S. 45-36.22

or a deed of release or reconveyance.

An obligation release registered pursuant to

G.S. 45-36.23

.

An assumption agreement.

A subordination agreement.

An instrument terminating future optional advances registered pursuant to

G.S. 45-72

.

A certificate of extension extending the period for advances under an equity line of credit registered pursuant to

G.S. 45-82.1

.

A notice of extension relating to after-acquired property registered pursuant to

G.S. 47-20.5

.

The revocation of a power of attorney.

Any instrument authorized or directed by law to be indexed under the provisions of this section.

Any instrument for which the register of deeds is authorized or directed by law to make a subsequent entry upon the margin of the record of an original instrument.

The register of deeds shall register each subsequent instrument as a separate instrument and do all of the following:

Index the parties to the subsequent instrument.

If the subsequent instrument names one or more of the original parties to the original instrument, index the original parties to the original instrument as they are named in the subsequent instrument.

If the subsequent instrument states the recording data for the original instrument, reference the recording data of the original instrument as that recording data is stated in the subsequent instrument to each name so indexed.

The register of deeds shall not be required to (i) read or examine any page of an instrument, other than the first two pages, to determine whether it is a subsequent instrument within the meaning of this section, or (ii) verify or make inquiry concerning the accuracy, sufficiency, or completeness of information about an original instrument contained in any subsequent instrument. The register of deeds is expressly authorized to rely solely on the information contained in the subsequent instrument, including, but not limited to, the names of the original parties to the original instrument and the recording data for the original instrument.

History.

1963, c. 1021, s. 3; 1991, c. 114, s. 1; 2005-123, s. 8; 2011-312, s. 28; 2017-110, s. 4; 2018-80, s. 1.3; 2021-91, s. 12.

§ 161-14.2.
Indexing procedures for instruments and documents filed in the office of the register of deeds.

The following procedure shall be used in making index entries:

When each word of the signature is legible and it gives the complete name of the party, the signature shall govern.

When the signature is legible but initials or abbreviations are used, any additional information given by the printed or typed name and not in conflict with the signature shall govern.

When none of the words in the signature are legible, the printed or typed name shall govern.

When one or more of the words in the signature are legible, then the words that are legible shall govern; the words that appear in the printed or typed name shall govern over the words of the signature that are not legible.

When the spelling of any word in a legible signature and the spelling of the corresponding word in the typed or printed name is at variance, and the variance would cause the entries to be made at different places in the index, then the instrument shall be indexed under both spellings.

When a reasonable interpretation of an illegible word in a signature is at variance with the corresponding word in a typed or printed name, and the variance would cause the entries to be made at different places in the index, then the instrument shall be indexed in both places.

History.

1969, c. 694, s. 1.

§ 161-15.
Certify and register copies.

When a deed, mortgage, or other conveyance conveying real estate situate in two or more counties is presented for registration duly probated and a copy thereof is presented with the same, the register shall compare the copy with the original, and if it be a true copy thereof he shall certify the same, and thereupon the register shall endorse the original deed or conveyance as duly registered in his county, designating the book in which the same is registered, and deliver the original deed to the party entitled thereto and register the same from the certified copy thereof to be retained by him for that purpose.

History.

1899, c. 302; Rev., s. 2657; C.S., s. 3554.

§ 161-16.
Liability for failure to register.

In case of his failure to register any deed or other instrument within the time and in the manner required by

G.S. 161-14

, the register shall be liable, in an action on his official bond, to the party injured by such delay.

History.

1868, c. 35, s. 10; Code, s. 3660; Rev., s. 2659; C.S., s. 3555; 2019-177, s. 8.3.

Local Modification.

Caswell: 1977, c. 391.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2019-177, s. 8.3, effective July 26, 2019, substituted “G.S. 161-14” for “G.S. 161-15.”

§ 161-17.
Papers filed alphabetically.

The register shall keep in files alphabetically labeled all original instruments delivered to him for registration, and on application for such originals by any person entitled to their custody, he shall deliver the same.

History.

1868, c. 35, s. 11; Code, s. 3661; Rev., s. 2660; C.S., s. 3556.

§ 161-18.
Transcribe and index books.

The board of county commissioners, when they deem it necessary, may direct the register of deeds to transcribe and index such of the books in the register’s office as from decay or other cause may require to be transcribed and indexed. They may allow him such compensation at the expense of the county for this work as they think just. The books when so transcribed and approved by the board shall be public records as the original books, and copies therefrom may be certified accordingly.

History.

1868, c. 35, s. 12; Code, s. 3662; Rev., s. 2661; C.S., s. 3557.

§ 161-19.
Number of survey in grants registered.

The register of deeds in each county in this State, when grants have been registered without the number of tract or survey, shall place in the registration of the grants the number of the tract or survey, when the same shall be furnished him by the grantee or other person; and in registering any grant he shall register the number of the tract or survey.

History.

1889, c. 522, s. 2; Rev., s. 2662; C.S., s. 3558.

§ 161-20.
Certificate of survey registered.

It shall be the duty of the register of deeds in each county, when any grant is presented for registration with a certificate of survey attached, to register such certificate of survey, together with all endorsements thereon, together with said grant, and a record of any certificate of survey so made shall be read in evidence in any action or proceeding: Provided, the failure to register such certificate of survey shall not invalidate the registration of the grant.

History.

1905, c. 243; Rev., s. 2663; C.S., s. 3559.

§ 161-21.
General index kept.

The board of county commissioners shall, at the expense of the county, maintain a consolidated index of all the deeds and other documents affecting real property in the register’s office.

History.

1868, c. 35, s. 13; Code, s. 3663; Rev., s. 2664; C.S., s. 3560; 1929, c. 327, s. 1; 1987, c. 620, s. 5; 2008-194, s. 7(d).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2008-194, s. 7(d), effective August 8, 2008, rewrote the first sentence; and deleted the former second sentence, which provided the board of county commissioners additional authority to install the “Family” index system.

§ 161-22.
Index of registered instruments.

Except as otherwise provided by statute, the register of deeds shall provide and keep in the register’s office full and complete alphabetical indexes of the names of the parties to all liens, grants, deeds, mortgages, bonds, and other instruments required or authorized to be registered, and the indexes shall state in full the names of all parties, whether grantors, grantees, vendors, vendees, obligors, or obligees. The full names of parties shall be entered in the indexes in accordance with the minimum indexing standards adopted pursuant to

G.S. 147-54.3(b)

and (b1). Reference shall be made, opposite each name, to the book and page or other location where the instrument is registered. All instruments shall be indexed on either the temporary or permanent index within 24 hours of registration. The register of deeds is not required to index an instrument that is part of a document containing multiple instruments, as defined in G.S. 161-10(a)(1), unless the title of that instrument is shown on the first page of the document and the additional registration fee is paid as required by G.S. 161-10(a)(1).

Repealed by Session Laws 2008-194, s. 7(e), effective August 8, 2008.

Repealed by Session Laws 2008-194, s. 7(e), effective July 1, 2008.

Deeds of trust may be indexed in the names of the grantor and beneficiary only.

Certificates filed for recording pursuant to G.S. 59-2, the Uniform Limited Partnership Act, shall be indexed only under the names of the partnership and each of the general partners. The register of deeds shall cause a statement to be affixed or printed on the index page of the book or books in which limited partnership agreements are filed that the documents are indexed only in the names of the partnership and of each of the general partners.

The alphabetical indexes required by this section may be maintained in index books, on index cards, on film, or in computers or other automated data-processing machines. If the index is maintained in a computer or other automated data processing machine, the register of deeds shall, at least once each month, obtain from the computer or other automated data-processing machine a printed copy on paper or film, or a tape or disk, of all index entries made since the previous printed or filmed copy, or tape or disk, was obtained. These printed or filmed copies, tapes or disks, shall be retained as security copies and may not be altered or destroyed until a subsequent security copy is made containing the index entries from all previous security copies.

The register of deeds may adopt rules establishing indexing procedures and the format of the indexes. The rules shall conform with the requirements of this section and of other applicable statutes. The rules may address such subjects, by way of example and not limitation, as the indexing of business firms, the indexing of names containing numerals, and the indexing of government agencies. The rules shall be posted in at least two prominent places in the office of register of deeds and shall also be placed near the index books or in user manuals in offices using automated indexing systems.

No instrument shall be deemed registered until it has been indexed in a manner to put a reasonably careful and prudent examiner on notice upon inquiry, and, if upon inquiry, the instrument would have been found.

Repealed by Session Laws 2008-194, s. 7(e), effective August 8, 2008.

History.

1876-7, c. 93, s. 1; Code, s. 3664; 1899, c. 501; Rev., ss. 2665, 3600; C.S., s. 3561; 1929, c. 327, s. 2; 1967, cc. 443, 1262; 1973, c. 1136, ss. 1, 2; 1983, c. 127; c. 699, ss. 1, 3; 1989, c. 523, s. 2; 1993, c. 178, ss. 1, 2, 4, 5.; c. 539, s. 1096; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2005-123, s. 9; 2008-194, s. 7(e).

Local Modification.

Alamance: 1963, c. 739; 1965, cc. 17, 150; Buncombe: 1971, c. 1069; Duplin: 1963, c. 739; 1965, cc. 17, 150; Forsyth: 1963, c. 739; 1965, cc. 17, 150; 1971, c. 1069; Guilford: 1963, c. 739; 1965, cc. 17, 150; Orange: 1971, c. 1069; Wake and Wayne: 1963, c. 739; 1965, cc. 17, 150.

Cross References.

As to the use and confidential nature of actual addresses of Address Confidentiality Program participants by boards of elections for election-related purposes, see

G.S. 15C-8

.

§ 161-22.1.
Index and cross-index of immediate prior owners of land.

Whenever, any deed or other instrument conveying real property by a trustee, mortgagee, commissioner, or other officer appointed by the court, or by the sheriff under execution, is filed with the register of deeds for the purpose of being recorded, it shall be the duty of the register of deeds to index and cross-index as grantors the names of all persons recited in said instrument to be the persons whose interest in such real estate is being conveyed or from whom the title of such real estate was acquired by the grantor in such instrument.

History.

1947, c. 211, ss. 1, 2; 1969, c. 80, s. 5.

§ 161-22.2.
Parcel identifier number indexes.

In lieu of the alphabetical indexes required by

G.S. 161-21

, 161-22 and 161-22.1, the register of deeds of any county in which unique parcel identifier numbers have been assigned to all parcels of real property may install an index by land parcel identifier numbers. For each instrument filed of record, the entry in a land parcel identifier number index must contain the following information:

The parcel identifier number of the parcel or parcels affected;

A brief description of the parcel or parcels, including subdivision block and lot number, if any;

A description of the type of instrument recorded and the date the instrument was filed;

The names of the parties to the instrument to the same extent as required by

G.S. 161-22

and the legal status of the parties indexed;

The book and page number, or film reel and frame number, or other file number where the instrument is recorded.

Every instrument affecting real property filed for recording in the office of such register of deeds shall be indexed under the parcel identifier number of the land parcel or parcels affected.

The parcel identifier number index may be maintained in index books, on index cards, on film, or in computers or other automated data-processing machines. If the parcel identifier number index is maintained in a computer or other automated data-processing machine, the register of deeds shall, at least once each month, obtain from the computer or other data-processing machine a printed copy on paper or film of all index entries made since the previous printed copy was obtained. The printed copies shall be retained as security copies and shall not be altered or destroyed.

Before a register of deeds may install a parcel identifier number index in lieu of the alphabetical indexes required by

G.S. 161-22

, the proposed index must be approved by the Secretary of State. Before approving a parcel identifier number index, the Secretary must find that:

The requirements of this section,

G.S. 161-22

, and all other applicable indexing requirements of the North Carolina General Statutes and applicable judicial decisions will be met by the index;

Measures for the protection of the indexed information are such that computer or other machine failure will not cause an irremediable loss of the information;

Printed forms and index sheets used in the index permit a display of all information required by law and are otherwise adequate;

Any computer or other data-processing machine used and the program for the use of such machines are adequate to perform the tasks assigned to them;

Access to the information contained in the index can be obtained by the use of both a parcel identifier number and the name of any party to an instrument filed of record;

Any parcel identifier number either reflects the State plane coordinates of some point in the parcel, or is keyed to a map of the parcel that shows the location of the parcel within the county;

The parcel identifier numbering system is designed so that no parcel will be assigned the same number as any other parcel within the county;

The parcel identifier numbering system shows for parcels of land created by subdivision, the number of the parcel of land subdivided in addition to the numbers of the newly-created parcels;

The parcel identifier numbering system shows for parcels of land created by the combining of separate parcels, the numbers of the land parcels that were combined in addition to the number of the newly-created parcel;

The parcel identifier numbering system is capable of identifying condominium units and other separate legal interests that may be created in a single parcel of land;

The parcel identifier numbering system will meet the needs of the users as well as or better than the alphabetical indexes required by

G.S. 161-21

, 161-22 and 161-22.1.

The Secretary may require a register of deeds seeking approval of a parcel identifier number index to furnish him with any information concerning the index that is pertinent to the findings required for approval.

An approved parcel identifier number index shall become effective as the official real property index of the county as of the first day of July or the first day of January, as the board of commissioners directs, following approval by the Secretary of State.

In any county in which a parcel identifier index is the official index, the register of deeds shall post notices in the alphabetical index books and at other appropriate places in his office stating that the parcel identifier number index is the official index and the date when the change became effective.

History.

1977, c. 589; 1979, c. 700, s. 2; 1983, c. 49; 1985, c. 757, s. 161(a), (b); 1989, c. 727, s. 218(163); 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1004, s. 19(b); 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 1999-119, s. 3.

Local Modification.

Orange: 1983, c. 3.

§ 161-22.3.
Minimum standards for land records management.

In addition to the recording and indexing procedures set forth in this Article, the register of deeds shall follow the rules specifying minimum standards and procedures in land records management adopted by the Department of Secretary of State pursuant to

G.S. 147-54.3(b1)

.

History.

1991, c. 697, s. 2; 1993, c. 178, s. 3; 2015-264, s. 25.

Local Modification.

Brunswick: 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 629, s. 2 (effective January 1, 1999).

§ 161-23.
Clerk to board of commissioners.

The register of deeds, or such other county officer or employee as the board of county commissioners shall designate in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 153-40, shall be ex officio clerk of the board of county commissioners, and as such shall perform the duties imposed by law or by order of said board.

History.

Const., art. 7, s. 2; 1868, c. 35, s. 15; Code, s. 3656; Rev., s. 2666; C.S., s. 3562; 1955, c. 247, s. 2.

Local Modification.

Guilford: 1955, c. 143; Wake: 1953, c. 644; 1959, c. 299.

§ 161-24.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 108, s. 99.

§ 161-25.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 803, s. 36.

§ 161-26.
Duties unperformed at expiration of term.

Whenever, upon the termination for any cause of the term of office of the register of deeds, it appears that he has failed to perform any of the duties of his office, the board of commissioners shall cause the same to be performed by another person or the successor of any such defaulting register. Such person or successor shall receive for his compensation the fees allowed for such services, and if any portion of the compensation has been paid to such defaulting register, the same may be recovered by the board of county commissioners, by suit on his official bond, for the benefit of the county or person injured thereby.

History.

1868, c. 35, s. 14; Code, s. 3655; Rev., s. 2669; C.S., s. 3566.

§ 161-27.
Register of deeds failing to discharge duties; penalty.

If any register of deeds fails to perform any of the duties imposed or authorized by law, he shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor, and he shall be removed from office.

No assistant register of deeds or deputy register of deeds recusing in accordance with

G.S. 51-5.5

may be charged under this section for recusal to issue marriage licenses in accordance with Chapter 51 of the General Statutes.

History.

1868, c. 35, s. 18; Code, s. 3659; Rev., s. 3599; C.S., s. 3567; 1993, c. 539, s. 1097; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2015-75, s. 3.

Cross References.

As to misconduct in public office and penalty therefor, see

G.S. 14-228

et seq.

As to penalty for issuing license unlawfully, see

G.S. 51-17

.

As to authority of clerk of court to give surety by mortgage deposited with register, see

G.S. 58-74-20

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-75, s. 3, effective June 11, 2015, added the subsection (a) designation and added subsection (b).

§ 161-28.
Validation of acts of assistant and deputy registers of deeds performed pending filling of vacancy in office of register of deeds.

Any and all acts and duties performed by any and all assistant or deputy registers of deeds appointed and acting under the provisions of

G.S. 161-6

or any other provisions of law, general, local, or special, after a vacancy may have occurred from any cause in the office of register of deeds, including, but not restricted to, a vacancy occurring as a result of the death in office of any incumbent register of deeds, and before the board of county commissioners shall have filled such vacancy by the appointment of a successor and his qualification for office as required by law, under and pursuant to the provisions of

G.S. 161-5

and any other applicable provisions of law, shall be and the same are hereby validated, ratified and confirmed to all intents and purposes as if performed by an incumbent in the office of register of deeds and to all intents and purposes as if performed under and pursuant to specific provisions of law authorizing and empowering the register of deeds, or any assistant or deputy registers of deeds, to perform all such acts and duties. The provisions of this validating act shall include, but not be restricted to, all acts and duties of the office of register of deeds, or of the office of assistant or deputy register of deeds, as enumerated and set forth under the specific provisions of this Chapter, or under the provisions of any other general laws as set forth in the General Statutes of North Carolina, or in any other provisions of law, private, local or special.

History.

1965, c. 835, s. 1.

§ 161-29.
Validating acts of assistant and deputy registers of deeds in failing to execute instruments in the name of the register of deeds.

Any and all acts and duties performed by any and all assistant or deputy registers of deeds in executing any instrument, while acting under the provisions of

G.S. 161-6

or any other provisions of law, general, local or special, which failed to substantially comply with

G.S. 161-6(b)

, shall be and the same are hereby validated, ratified and confirmed to all intents and purposes as if executed in full compliance with

G.S. 161-6(b)

.

The provisions of this validating act shall include all acts and duties of the office of assistant or deputy register of deeds, as enumerated and set forth under the specific provisions of this Chapter, or under the provisions of any general laws as set forth in the General Statutes of North Carolina, or in any other provisions of law, private, local or special.

History.

1973, c. 166, ss. 1, 2.

§ 161-29.1.
Validating acts of assistant and deputy registers of deeds performed before they were sworn into office.

All acts and duties heretofore performed by any and all assistant or deputy registers of deeds, who were appointed but who were not sworn into office or who were sworn into office after their duties commenced, shall be and the same are hereby validated, ratified, and confirmed to all intents and purposes as if performed by assistant or deputy registers of deeds who were theretofore formally appointed and sworn into office, as required by

G.S. 161-6

, or as required by any other provision of law.

History.

1977, c. 124, s. 1.

§ 161-30.
Modernization of land records.

The county commissioners of any county may require that the register of deeds shall not accept for registration any map or instrument affecting real property unless the following requirements are satisfied:

With the exception of a map or instrument that is submitted electronically, the name and address of the person to whom the map or instrument is to be returned is affixed on the face thereof.

The grantee’s or owner’s permanent mailing address is affixed on the face thereof.

(a1)

A map or instrument that is submitted electronically shall not be required to contain on its face the name and address of the person to whom the map or instrument is to be returned. The register of deeds shall not be required to return a recorded map or instrument that was submitted electronically but may return to the submitting party a recorded map or instrument that was submitted electronically in accordance with an authorizing agreement.

In any county in which parcel identifiers have been assigned to any of the real property situated within the county, the county commissioners may require that the register of deeds shall not accept for registration any map, deed, deed of trust or other instrument affecting real property unless the parcel identifier for all of the property described and affected is affixed and verified by the county on the face of the map or instrument or affixed and verified by the county as a part of the legal description contained in any instrument.

Failure to comply with the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) above shall not affect the validity of any map or other instrument that is duly recorded.

History.

1973, c. 992; 2019-117, s. 2.

§ 161-31.
Tax certification.

Tax Certification. — The board of commissioners of a county may, by resolution, require the register of deeds not to accept any deed transferring real property for registration unless the county tax collector has certified that no delinquent ad valorem county taxes, ad valorem municipal taxes, or other taxes with which the collector is charged are a lien on the property described in the deed. The county commissioners may describe the form the certification must take in its resolution.

(a1)

Exception to Tax Certification. —

If a board of county commissioners adopts a resolution pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, notwithstanding the resolution, the register of deeds shall accept without certification a deed submitted for registration under the supervision of a closing attorney and containing this statement on the deed: “This instrument prepared by:
_______________ , a licensed North Carolina attorney. Delinquent taxes, if any, to be paid by the closing attorney to the county tax collector upon disbursement of closing proceeds.”

Applicability. — This section applies only to Alamance, Alexander, Anson, Beaufort, Bertie, Bladen, Brunswick, Buncombe, Burke, Cabarrus, Caldwell, Camden, Carteret, Caswell, Catawba, Cherokee, Chowan, Clay, Cleveland, Columbus, Currituck, Dare, Davidson, Davie, Duplin, Durham, Edgecombe, Forsyth, Franklin, Gaston, Gates, Graham, Granville, Greene, Halifax, Harnett, Haywood, Henderson, Hertford, Hoke, Hyde, Iredell, Jackson, Johnston, Jones, Lee, Lenoir, Lincoln, Macon, Madison, Martin, McDowell, Montgomery, Nash, Northampton, Onslow, Pasquotank, Pender, Perquimans, Person, Pitt, Polk, Randolph, Robeson, Rockingham, Rowan, Rutherford, Sampson, Scotland, Stanly, Stokes, Surry, Swain, Transylvania, Tyrrell, Vance, Warren, Washington, Wayne, Wilson, Yadkin, and Yancey Counties.

History.

2001-464, s. 1; 2001-513, s. 14; 2002-51, s. 1; 2003-72, s. 1; 2003-189, s. 6; 2003-354, s. 3; 2004-65, s. 1; 2005-109, s. 1; 2005-433, s. 2(a); 2006-16, s. 1; 2006-150, s. 1; 2007-221, s. 1; 2009-290, s. 1; 2010-44, s. 1; 2011-33, s. 1; 2011-45, s. 1; 2012-23, s. 3; 2012-114, s. 1; 2014-29, s. 1; 2017-81, s. 2; 2018-8, s. 1; 2019-25, s. 1.

Local Modification.

Duplin: 2010-24.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-65, s. 1, effective July 8, 2004, added the following counties in subsection (b): Edgecombe, Halifax, Lenoir, Nash, Pender and Wilson.

Session Laws 2005-109, s. 1, effective June 23, 2005, inserted “Johnston,” “Onslow,” “Robeson” and “Surry” in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2005-433, s. 2(a), effective September 22, 2005, deleted “Alleghany” preceding “Anson” in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2006-16, s. 1, effective July 1, 2006, inserted “Tyrrell” in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2006-150, s. 1, effective July 20, 2006, inserted
“Davie” and “Lincoln” in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2007-221, s. 1, effective July 16, 2007, inserted “Burke,” “Caswell,” “Greene,” “Jones,” and “Wayne” in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2009-290, s. 1, effective July 13, 2009, inserted “Alexander” and “Catawba” in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2010-44, s. 1, effective July 1, 2010, in subsection (b), inserted “Dare” and “McDowell.”

Session Laws 2011-33, s. 1, effective April 12, 2011, inserted “Alamance” in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2011-45, s. 1, effective April 20, 2011, in subsection (b), inserted “Alamance” and “Brunswick, Buncombe” and substituted “Yadkin, and Yancey Counties” for “and Yadkin Counties.”

Session Laws 2012-23, s. 3, effective June 12, 2012, inserted “Sampson” in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2012-114, s. 1, effective June 28, 2012, inserted “Stokes” in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2014-29, s. 1, effective June 25, 2014, in subsection (b), inserted “Bladen”, “Columbus”, “Franklin”, and “Hoke.”

Session Laws 2017-81, s. 2, effective June 29, 2017, inserted “Caldwell” in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2018-8, s. 1, effective June 14, 2018, added “Scotland” following “Sampson” in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2019-25, s. 1, effective June 11, 2019, inserted “Randolph,” preceding “Robeson.” in subsection (b).

§§ 161-32 through 161-49.

Reserved for future codification purposes.